Mississippi, session 2026, HB1142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 99-5-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-5-25.  (1)  (a)  The purpose of bail is to guarantee appearance and a bail bond shall not be forfeited for any other reason. (b) If a defendant in any criminal case, proceeding or matter fails to appear for any proceeding as ordered by the court, then the court shall order the bail forfeited and a judgment nisi and a bench warrant issued at the time of nonappearance.  The clerk of the court shall notify the surety of the forfeiture by writ of scire facias, with a copy of the judgment nisi and bench warrant attached thereto, within ten (10) working days of such order of judgment nisi * * * either by * * * personal service or by certified mail. personal service or electronic transmission.  The clerk shall execute and file of record a certificate of service, signed by the clerk or the clerk's designee under penalty of perjury, certifying: (i)  That the writ of scire facias, together with attached copies of the judgment nisi and bench warrant, was personally served or electronically transmitted on a specified date; (ii) The method of service or transmission used, including the location of the personal service made or email address to which it was directed.  In addition to the certificate, the clerk shall retain in the court file or electronic case record proof of outgoing transmission, such as a copy of the sent email showing date, time, recipient address, and attachments.  The certificate of service together with the retained proof transmission shall constitute prima facie evidence that the writ of scire facias and attachments were properly provided as required herein.  The failure of the surety, surety agent, surety company, or defendant to receive the writ shall not constitute a defense to the forfeiture and shall not be grounds for discharge, remission, reduction, setting aside, or continuance of the forfeiture.  Electronic transmission may also be made by utilizing the Mississippi Electronic Court System. Failure to provide the required notice within ten (10) working days shall constitute prima facie evidence that the order shall be set aside, and the clerk shall accept a set-aside order on behalf of the surety to that effect for submission to the court.  All felony warrants issued by a court for nonappearance shall be put on the National Crime Information Center (NCIC) index with no restrictions until the defendant is returned to custody. (c)  The judgment nisi shall be returnable for ninety (90) days from the date of issuance.  If during such period the defendant appears before the court, or is arrested and surrendered, then the judgment nisi shall be set aside and a copy of the judgment that is set aside shall be served on the surety * * * by personal service or certified mail as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1). If the surety produces the defendant or provides to the court reasonable mitigating circumstances upon such showing, then the forfeiture shall not be made final.  If the forfeiture is made final, a copy of the final judgment shall be served on the surety within ten (10) working days * * * by either personal service or certified mail as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1).  Reasonable mitigating circumstances shall be that the defendant is incarcerated in another jurisdiction, that the defendant is hospitalized under a doctor's care, that the defendant is in a recognized drug rehabilitation program, that the defendant has been placed in a witness protection program and it shall be the duty of any such agency placing such defendant into a witness protection program to notify the court and the court to notify the surety, or any other reason justifiable to the court. (d)  Execution upon the final judgment shall be automatically stayed for ninety (90) days from the date of entry of the final judgment.  If, at any time before execution of the final judgment, the defendant appears in court either voluntarily or in custody after surrender or arrest, the court shall on its own motion direct that the forfeiture be set aside and the bond exonerated as of the date the defendant first appeared in court. (2)  (a)  If a final judgment is entered against a surety licensed by the Department of Insurance and has not been set aside after ninety (90) days, or later if such time is extended by the court issuing the judgment nisi, then the court shall order the department to revoke the authority of the surety to write bail bonds.  The commissioner shall, upon notice of the court, notify the surety within five (5) working days of receipt of revocation.  If after thirty (30) working days of such notification the revocation order has not been set aside by the court, then the commissioner shall revoke the authority of the surety and all agents of the surety and shall notify the sheriff of every county of such revocation. (b)  Before the revocation authorized in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the surety may submit proof to the department that the defendant has been surrendered to the appropriate authorities or that the bond has been paid directly to the court or other proper authorities, such proof to include, but not be limited to: (i)  A receipt of payment to the bond; (ii)  A surrender certificate; or (iii)  A notice of surrender from the proper authorities, including foreign jurisdictions. (3)  If within eighteen (18) months of the date of the final forfeiture the defendant appears for court, is arrested or surrendered to the court, or if the defendant is found to be incarcerated in another jurisdiction and a hold order placed on the defendant, then the amount of bail, less reasonable extradition cost, excluding attorney fees, shall be refunded by the court upon application by the surety. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.